Utah statutes.
63G-7-804.   Liability insurance -- Methods for purchase or renewal.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a contract or policy of insurance may be purchased or renewed under this chapter only upon public bid to be let to the lowest and best bidder.

(2)  The purchase or renewal of insurance by the state shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

